Utah statutes.
53-3-411.   Description of CDL -- Information to be included.

(1)  The CDL certificate shall be printed with the identifying words "Commercial Driver License" or "CDL".

(2)  To the maximum extent practicable, the CDL certificate shall be resistant to alteration.

(3)  The CDL certificate shall include:

(a)  the legal name and principal place of residence of the holder;

(b)  the holder's photograph in color;

(c)  a physical description of the holder, including sex and height;

(d)  the holder's birth date;

(e)  the holder's Utah license certificate number;

(f)  the holder's signature;

(g)  the class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles the holder is authorized to drive;

(h)  any endorsements or restrictions to which the holder is subject;

(i)  the name of the issuing state; and

(j)  the dates between which the CDL is valid.

(4)  The CDL may not include the holder's Social Security number.



Amended by Chapter 144, 2004 General Session

